Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Chapter 9. Judicial Conference of Virginia for District Courts.

§ 16.1-218.
Established; active and honorary members.

There is hereby established a Judicial Conference of Virginia for District Courts whose active members shall be the judge of every general district court and juvenile and domestic relations district court of the Commonwealth. The Attorney General of Virginia, the Chairman of the House Committee for Courts of Justice or his designee who shall be a member of the committee, the Chairman of the Senate Committee on the Judiciary or his designees who shall be a member of the committee, the president and secretary of the Virginia State Bar, the president and secretary of the Virginia Bar Association, the president and secretary of the Virginia Trial Lawyers Association, the president and secretary of the Old Dominion Bar Association, the president and secretary of the Virginia Association of Commonwealth’s Attorneys, the president and secretary of the Virginia Women Attorneys Association, the president and secretary of the Virginia College of Criminal Defense Attorneys, and the president and secretary of the Virginia Association of Defense Attorneys shall be honorary members of the Conference without voting privilege.

History.

1962, c. 622; 1970, c. 559; 1972, c. 518; 1975, c. 334; 1980, c. 447; 1981, c. 231; 1989, c. 597; 1990, c. 249; 2001, c. 229; 2008, c. 115.

Cross references.

As to the Judicial Conference of Virginia for courts of record, see §

17.1-706

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “the Chairman of the House Committee for Courts of Justice or his designee who shall be a member of the committee, the Chairman of the Senate Committee on the Judiciary or his designees who shall be a member of the committee” for “the chairmen of the Courts of Justice Committees of the Senate and House of Delegates or their designees who shall be members of the Courts of Justice committees.” March 10, 2021.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 229 inserted “the president and secretary of the Virginia College of Criminal Defense Attorneys” in the second sentence.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 115 inserted “or their designees who shall be members of the Courts of Justice committees” near the beginning of the second sentence.

§ 16.1-219.
President; election of executive committee; assistance by Executive Secretary of Supreme Court.

The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall be president of the Conference. The Conference shall elect from the judges of courts not of record seven judges who shall act as an executive committee. The Chief Justice shall be chairman of the executive committee, but he may designate the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court to preside at meetings of the executive committee and the Conference and may assign him administrative duties relating to the committee and Conference.

History.

1962, c. 622; 1970, c. 559.

§ 16.1-220.
Meetings; active members must give notice of inability to attend; special session concerning motor vehicle and traffic laws.

The Conference shall meet at least once in each calendar year at the call of the president and at such other times as may be designated by him or by the executive committee for the purpose of discussing and considering means and methods of improving the administration of justice in this Commonwealth. If any active member shall for any cause be unable to attend, he shall promptly notify the president. Unless excused from attendance, it shall be the duty of each active member to attend and remain throughout the proceedings of the Conference.

In conjunction with said meetings and as a part thereof, the Conference shall conduct a session at least once each year devoted to the consideration of and instruction on the Commonwealth’s motor vehicle and traffic laws and their proper administration. Unless excused from attendance, it shall be the duty of each active member whose jurisdiction includes cases involving violations of such laws to attend this session. The Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court shall be responsible for preparing the program for this session, and the office of the Attorney General, Department of State Police and Department of Motor Vehicles shall cooperate with him in preparing for this session.

History.

1962, c. 622; 1968, c. 496; 1970, c. 559.

§ 16.1-221.
Members to receive actual expenses.

The active members and honorary members shall receive their actual expenses while in attendance at the meetings of the Conference, and of the executive committee.

History.

1962, c. 622; 1964, c. 9.